Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.021

Commencement of terms of office.

The regular term of office of each senator and representative shall commence on the second Monday in January following the date of election.

[ 1987 c 13 s 1; 1981 c 288 s 68. Formerly RCW 44.07B.870.]